Ohio, session 136, SB289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4713.08 be amended and section 5
4713.47 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4713.08. (A) The state cosmetology and barber board 7
shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised 8
Code as necessary to implement this chapter. The rules shall do 9
all of the following: 10
(1) Govern the practice of the branches of cosmetology; 11
(2) Specify conditions an individual must satisfy to 12
qualify for a temporary pre-examination work permit under 13
section 4713.22 of the Revised Code and the conditions and 14
method of renewing a temporary pre-examination work permit under 15
that section; 16
(3) Provide for the conduct of examinations under section 17
4713.24 of the Revised Code; 18

S. B. No. 289 Page 2
As Introduced
(4) Specify conditions under which the board will take 19
into account, under section 4713.32 of the Revised Code, 20
instruction an applicant for a license under section 4713.28, 21
4713.30, or 4713.31 of the Revised Code received more than five 22
years before the date of application for the license; 23
(5) Provide for the granting of waivers under section 24
4713.29 of the Revised Code; 25
(6) Specify conditions an applicant must satisfy for the 26
board to issue the applicant a license under section 4713.34 of 27
the Revised Code without the applicant taking an examination 28
conducted under section 4713.24 of the Revised Code; 29
(7) Specify locations in which glamour photography 30
services in which a branch of cosmetology is practiced may be 31
provided; 32
(8) Establish conditions and the fee for a temporary 33
special occasion work permit under section 4713.37 of the 34
Revised Code and specify the amount of time such a permit is 35
valid; 36
(9) Specify conditions an applicant must satisfy for the 37
board to issue the applicant an independent contractor license 38
under section 4713.39 of the Revised Code and the fee for 39
issuance and renewal of the license; 40
(10) Establish conditions under which food may be sold at 41
a salon; 42
(11) Specify which professions regulated by a professional 43
regulatory board of this state may be practiced in a salon under 44
section 4713.42 of the Revised Code, including whether cosmetic 45
therapy may be practiced in a salon; 46

S. B. No. 289 Page 3
As Introduced
(12) Establish standards for the provision of cosmetic 47
therapy, massage therapy, or other professional service in a 48
salon pursuant to section 4713.42 of the Revised Code; 49
(13) Establish standards for board approval of, and the 50
granting of credits for, training in branches of cosmetology or 51
barbering at schools licensed in this state; 52
(14) Establish the manner in which a school licensed under 53
section 4713.44 of the Revised Code may offer post-secondary and 54
advanced practice programs; 55
(15) Establish infection control standards for the 56
practice of the branches of cosmetology and the operation of 57
salons and schools; 58
(16) Establish the application process for obtaining a 59
tanning facility permit under section 4713.48 of the Revised 60
Code, including the amount of the fee for an initial or renewed 61
permit; 62
(17) Establish standards for installing and operating a 63
tanning facility in a manner that ensures the health and safety 64
of consumers, including infection control standards and 65
standards that do all of the following: 66
(a) Establish a maximum safe time of exposure to radiation 67
and a maximum safe temperature at which sun lamps may be 68
operated; 69
(b) Require consumers to wear protective eyeglasses; 70
(c) Require consumers to be supervised as to the length of 71
time consumers use the facility's sun lamps; 72
(d) Require the operator to prohibit consumers from 73
standing too close to sun lamps and to post signs warning 74

S. B. No. 289 Page 4
As Introduced
consumers of the potential effects of radiation on individuals 75
taking certain medications and of the possible relationship of 76
the radiation to skin cancer; 77
(e) Require the installation of protective shielding for 78
sun lamps and handrails for consumers; 79
(f) Require floors to be dry during operation of lamps; 80
(g) Establish procedures an operator must follow in making 81
reasonable efforts in compliance with section 4713.50 of the 82
Revised Code to determine the age of an individual seeking to 83
use sun lamp tanning services. 84
(18) If the board, under section 4713.61 of the Revised 85
Code, develops a procedure for classifying licenses inactive, do 86
both of the following: 87
(a) Establish a fee for having a license classified 88
inactive that reflects the cost to the board of providing the 89
inactive license service; 90
(b) Specify the continuing education that an individual 91
whose license has been classified inactive must complete to have 92
the license restored. The continuing education shall be 93
sufficient to ensure the minimum competency in the use or 94
administration of a new procedure or product required by a 95
licensee necessary to protect public health and safety. The 96
requirement shall not exceed the cumulative number of hours of 97
continuing education that the individual would have been 98
required to complete had the individual retained an active 99
license. 100
(19) Establish a fee for approval of a continuing 101
education program under section 4713.62 of the Revised Code that 102
is adequate to cover any expense the board incurs in the 103

S. B. No. 289 Page 5
As Introduced
approval process; 104
(20) Establish requirements for students of schools who 105
are engaged in learning the theory and practice of barbering; 106
(21) Establish the minimum student-instructor ratio that a 107
school offering instruction in the theory and practice of 108
barbering must meet; 109
(22) Establish procedures for administering the natural 110
hair stylist education grant program established under section 111
4713.47 of the Revised Code; 112
(23) Anything else necessary to implement this chapter. 113
(B) The rules adopted under division (A)(2) of this 114
section may establish additional conditions for a temporary pre- 115
examination work permit under section 4713.22 of the Revised 116
Code that are applicable to individuals who practice a branch of 117
cosmetology in another state or country. 118
(C) The conditions specified in rules adopted under 119
division (A)(6) of this section may include that an applicant is 120
applying for a license to practice a branch of cosmetology for 121
which the board determines an examination is unnecessary. 122
(D) The rules adopted under division (A)(11) of this 123
section shall not include a profession if practice of the 124
profession in a salon is a violation of a statute or rule 125
governing the profession. 126
(E) The infection control standards established under 127
division (A)(15) of this section shall focus in particular on 128
precautions to be employed to prevent infectious or contagious 129
diseases being created or spread. 130
(F) The fee established by rules adopted under division 131

S. B. No. 289 Page 6
As Introduced
(A)(16) of this section shall cover the cost the board incurs in 132
inspecting tanning facilities and enforcing the board's rules 133
but may not exceed one hundred dollars per location of such 134
facilities. 135
Sec. 4713.47. (A) The state cosmetology and barber board 136
shall establish and administer a grant program to increase the 137
number of students engaged in learning or acquiring knowledge of 138
the practice of natural hair styling at a school. Under the 139
program, the board may award a grant to a school to offer any of 140
the following: 141
(1) A course of practical training and technical 142
instruction for natural hair styling under division (A)(1) of 143
section 4713.44 of the Revised Code; 144
(2) Post-secondary programs or advanced practice programs 145
to broaden a licensee's knowledge of and skill set in natural 146
hair styling, if the school offers a course described in 147
division (A)(1) of this section; 148
(3) Seminars or workshops focused on hair care techniques 149
and management of textured hair and cultural sensitivity, in 150
collaboration with experts in the practice or teaching of 151
natural hair styling and educators of diversity training. 152
(B) A school seeking to participate in the grant program 153
shall apply to the board in the form and manner prescribed by 154
the board. 155
(C) A school awarded a grant to offer a post-secondary 156
program or advanced practice program under division (A)(2) of 157
this section may include any of the following topics as part of 158
the program: 159
(1) The science and anatomy of different hair textures and 160

S. B. No. 289 Page 7
As Introduced
care practices for textured hair, based on the books and other 161
teachings of Dr. Willie Morrow; 162
(2) Training in styling techniques for textured hair, such 163
as braiding, locking, twisting, weaving, or other natural, 164
protective, or cultural hair styles; 165
(3) Training in hair and scalp care for textured hair, 166
such as treatment options including deep conditioning and hot 167
oil massages or other services to improve moisture retention, 168
curl definition, or hair strengthening; 169
(4) The significance of hair care for textured hair and 170
natural, protective, or cultural hair styles. 171
(D) The board shall adopt rules under section 4713.08 of 172
the Revised Code that are necessary for the administration of 173
the program, including eligibility requirements for a school to 174
receive a grant, the amounts in which grants may be made, and 175
the total amount that may be awarded to a school. 176
Section 2. That existing section 4713.08 of the Revised 177
Code is hereby repealed. 178
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 179
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 180
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 181
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 182
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 183
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 184
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 185
186
1 2 3 4 5
A COS COSMETOLOGY AND BARBER BOARD

S. B. No. 289 Page 8
As Introduced
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 879500 Grant Programs $1,000,000 $0
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $1,000,000 $0
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,000,000 $0
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 187
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 188
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 189
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 190
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 191
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 192
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 193
applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 194